California statutes. Labor Code
(c) (1) The Labor Commissioner shall maintain a public list of the names of each contractor and subcontractor who has been found to have committed a willful violation of Section 1775 or to whom a final order, which is no longer subject to judicial review, has been issued.

(2) The list shall include the date of each assessment, the amount of wages and penalties assessed, and the amount collected.

(3) The list shall be updated at least quarterly, and the contractor’s or subcontractor’s name shall remain on that list until the assessment is satisfied, or for a period of three years beginning from the date of the issuance of the assessment, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1336)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.1.

(a) The period for service of assessments shall be tolled for the period of time required by the Director of Industrial Relations to determine whether a project is a public work, including a determination on administrative appeal, if applicable, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1773.5. The period for service of assessments shall also be tolled for the period of time that a contractor or subcontractor fails to provide in a timely manner certified payroll records pursuant to a request from the Labor Commissioner or a joint labor-management committee under Section 1776, or an approved labor compliance program under Section 1771.5 or 1771.7.

(b) (1) The body awarding the contract for a
 public work shall furnish, within 10 days after receipt of a written request from the Labor Commissioner, a copy of the valid notice of completion for the public work filed in the office of the county recorder, or a document evidencing the awarding body’s acceptance of the public work on a particular date, whichever occurs later, by first-class mail addressed to the office of the Labor Commissioner that is listed on the written request. If, at the time of receipt of the Labor Commissioner’s written request, a valid notice of completion has not been filed by the awarding body in the office of the county recorder and there is no document evidencing the awarding body’s acceptance of the public work on a particular date, the awarding body shall so notify the office of the Labor Commissioner that is listed on the written request. Thereafter, the awarding body shall furnish copies of the applicable document within 10 days after filing a valid notice of completion with the county recorder’s office, or within 10
 days of the awarding body’s acceptance of the public work on a particular date.

(2) If the awarding body fails to timely furnish the Labor Commissioner with the documents identified in paragraph (1), the period for service of assessments under Section 1741 shall be tolled until the Labor Commissioner’s actual receipt of the valid notice of completion for the public work or a document evidencing the awarding body’s acceptance of the public work on a particular date.

(c) The tolling provisions in this section shall also apply to the period of time for commencing an action brought by a joint labor-management committee pursuant to Section 1771.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 377.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.

(a) An affected contractor or subcontractor may obtain review of a civil wage and penalty assessment under this chapter by transmitting a written request to the office of the Labor Commissioner that appears on the assessment within 60 days after service of the assessment. If no hearing is requested within 60 days after service of the assessment, the assessment shall become final.

(b) Upon receipt of a timely request, a hearing shall be commenced within 90 days before the director, who shall appoint an impartial hearing officer possessing the qualifications of an administrative law judge pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11502 of the Government Code. The appointed hearing officer shall be an employee of the department, but shall not be an employee of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. The contractor or subcontractor shall be provided an opportunity to review evidence to be utilized by the Labor Commissioner at the hearing within 20 days of the receipt of the written request for a hearing. Any evidence obtained by the Labor Commissioner subsequent to the 20-day cutoff shall be promptly disclosed to the contractor or subcontractor.

The contractor or subcontractor shall have the burden of proving that the basis for the civil wage and penalty assessment is incorrect. The assessment shall be sufficiently detailed to provide fair notice to the contractor or subcontractor of the issues at the hearing.

Within 45 days of the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall issue a written decision affirming, modifying, or dismissing the assessment. The decision of the director shall consist of a notice of findings, findings, and an order. This decision shall be served on all parties and the awarding body pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Within 15 days of the issuance of the decision, the director may reconsider or modify the decision to correct an error, except that a clerical error may be corrected at any time.

The director shall adopt regulations setting forth procedures for hearings under this subdivision.

(c) An affected contractor or subcontractor may obtain review of the decision of the director by filing a petition for a writ of mandate to the appropriate superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 45 days after service of the decision. If no petition for writ of mandate is filed within 45 days after service of the decision, the order shall become final. If it is claimed in a petition for writ of mandate that the findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

(d) A certified copy of a final order may be filed by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the affected contractor or subcontractor has property or has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the certified order.

(e) A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and shall be given the same preference allowed by law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall not charge for the service performed by him or her pursuant to this section.

(f) An awarding body that has withheld funds in response to a civil wage and penalty assessment under this chapter shall, upon receipt of a certified copy of a final order that is no longer subject to judicial review, promptly transmit the withheld funds, up to the amount of the certified order, to the Labor Commissioner.

(g) This section shall provide the exclusive method for review of a civil wage and penalty assessment by the Labor Commissioner under this chapter or the decision of an awarding body to withhold contract payments pursuant to Section 1771.5.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 828, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2008, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.1.

(a) After 60 days following the service of a civil wage and penalty assessment under Section 1741 or a notice of withholding under subdivision (a) of Section 1771.6, the affected contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment or notice shall be liable for liquidated damages in an amount equal to the wages, or portion thereof, that still remain unpaid. If the assessment or notice subsequently is overturned or modified after administrative or judicial review, liquidated damages shall be payable only on the wages found to be due and unpaid. Any liquidated damages shall be distributed to the employee along with the unpaid wages. Section 203.5 shall not apply to claims for prevailing wages under this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), there shall be no liability for liquidated damages if the full amount of the assessment or notice, including penalties, has been deposited with the Department of Industrial Relations, within 60 days following service of the assessment or notice, for the department to hold in escrow pending administrative and judicial review. The department shall release the funds in escrow, plus any interest earned, to the persons and entities that are found to be entitled to those funds, within 30 days following either of the specified events occurring:

(1) The conclusion of all administrative and judicial review.

(2) The department receives written notice from the Labor Commissioner or his or her designee of a settlement or other final disposition of an assessment issued pursuant to Section 1741 or from the authorized representative of the
 awarding body of a settlement or other final disposition of a notice issued pursuant to Section 1771.6.

(c) The Labor Commissioner shall, upon receipt of a request from the affected contractor or subcontractor within 30 days following the service of a civil wage and penalty assessment under Section 1741, afford the contractor or subcontractor the opportunity to meet with the Labor Commissioner or his or her designee to attempt to settle a dispute regarding the assessment without the need for formal proceedings. The awarding body shall, upon receipt of a request from the affected contractor or subcontractor within 30 days following the service of a notice of withholding under subdivision (a) of Section 1771.6, afford the contractor or subcontractor the opportunity to meet with the designee of the awarding body to attempt to settle a dispute regarding the notice without the need for formal proceedings. The settlement meeting may be held in person
 or by telephone and shall take place before the expiration of the 60-day period for seeking administrative review. No evidence of anything said or any admission made for the purpose of, in the course of, or pursuant to, the settlement meeting is admissible or subject to discovery in any administrative or civil proceeding. No writing prepared for the purpose of, in the course of, or pursuant to, the settlement meeting, other than a final settlement agreement, is admissible or subject to discovery in any administrative or civil proceeding. The assessment or notice shall advise the contractor or subcontractor of the opportunity to request a settlement meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 16.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1743.

(a) The contractor and subcontractor shall be jointly and severally liable for all amounts due pursuant to a final order under this chapter or a judgment thereon. The Labor Commissioner shall first exhaust all reasonable remedies to collect the amount due from the subcontractor before pursuing the claim against the contractor.

(b) From the amount collected, the wage claim shall be satisfied prior to the amount being applied to penalties. If insufficient money is recovered to pay each worker in full, the money shall be prorated among all workers.

(c) Wages for workers who cannot be located
 shall be placed in the Industrial Relations Unpaid Wage Fund and held in trust for the workers pursuant to Section 96.7. Penalties shall be paid into the General Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 9558 of the Civil Code, the limitations period of any action on a payment bond filed by the Labor Commissioner shall be governed by the limitations period in Section 1741 and the tolling provisions of Section 1741.1. A final order under this chapter or a judgment thereon shall be binding, with respect to the amount found to be due, on a bonding company issuing a bond that secures the payment of wages and a surety on a bond. The limitations period of any action on a payment bond shall be tolled pending a final order that is no longer subject to judicial review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 2705)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Right of Action [1750. - 1750.]

1750.

(a) (1) The second lowest bidder, and any person, firm, association, trust, partnership, labor organization, corporation, or other legal entity which has, prior to the letting of the bids on the public works project in question, entered into a contract with the second lowest bidder, that suffers damage as a proximate result of a competitive bid for a public works project, as defined in subdivision (b), not being accepted due to the successful bidder’s violation, as evidenced by the conviction of the successful bidder therefor, of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, may bring an action for damages in the appropriate state court against the violating person or legal entity. 

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a successful bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of this code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both, was awarded the bid because that successful bidder was able to lower the bid due to this violation or these violations occurring on the contract for public work awarded by the public agency. 

(b) For purposes of this article: 

(1) “Public works project” means the construction, repair, remodeling, alteration, conversion, modernization, improvement, rehabilitation, replacement, or renovation of a public building or structure. 

(2) “Second lowest bidder” means the second lowest qualified bidder deemed responsive by the public agency awarding the contract for public work. 

(3) The “second lowest bidder” and the “successful bidder” may include any person, firm, association, corporation, or other legal entity. 

(c) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, in an amount to be determined in the court’s discretion, to the prevailing party. 

(d) For purposes of an action brought pursuant to this section, employee status shall be determined pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) with respect to alleged violations of that division, pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code with respect to alleged violations of that code, and pursuant to Section 2750.5 with respect to alleged violations of either Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or of the Unemployment Insurance Code. 

(e) The right of action established pursuant to this article shall not be construed to diminish rights of action established pursuant to Section 19102 of, and Article 1.8 (commencing with Section 20104.70) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of, the Public Contract Code. 

(f) A second lowest bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or both, within one year prior to filing the bid for public work, and who has failed to take affirmative steps to correct that violation or those violations, is prohibited from taking any action authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Wages [1770. - 1785.]

1770.

The Director of the Department of Industrial Relations shall determine the general prevailing rate of per diem wages in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 1773, and the director’s determination in the matter shall be final except as provided in Section 1773.4. Nothing in this article, however, shall prohibit the payment of more than the general prevailing rate of wages to any worker employed on public work. This chapter does not permit any overtime work in violation of Article 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 17.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

Except for public works projects of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, not less than the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for work of a similar character in the locality in which the public work is performed, and not less than the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for holiday and overtime work fixed as provided in this chapter, shall be paid to all workers employed on public works.

This section is applicable only to work performed under contract, and is not applicable to work carried out by a public agency with its own forces. This section is applicable to contracts let for maintenance work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.1.

(a) A contractor or subcontractor shall not be qualified to bid on, be listed in a bid proposal, subject to the requirements of Section 4104 of the Public Contract Code, or engage in the performance of any contract for public work, as defined in this chapter, unless currently registered and qualified to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5. It is not a violation of this section for an unregistered contractor to submit a bid that is authorized by Section 7029.1 of the Business and Professions Code or by Section 10164 or 20103.5 of the Public Contract Code, provided the contractor is registered to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5 at the time the contract is awarded.

(b) Notice of the requirement described in subdivision (a) shall be included in all bid invitations and public works contracts, and a bid shall not be accepted nor any contract or subcontract entered into without proof of the contractor or subcontractor’s current registration to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5.

(c) An inadvertent error in listing a subcontractor who is not registered pursuant to Section 1725.5 in a bid proposal shall not be grounds for filing a bid protest or grounds for considering the bid nonresponsive, provided that any of the following apply:

(1) The subcontractor is registered prior to the bid opening.

(2) Within 24 hours after the bid opening, the subcontractor is registered and
 has paid the penalty registration fee specified in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1725.5.

(3) The subcontractor is replaced by another registered subcontractor pursuant to Section 4107 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) Failure by a subcontractor to be registered to perform public work as required by subdivision (a) shall be grounds under Section 4107 of the Public Contract Code for the contractor, with the consent of the awarding authority, to substitute a subcontractor who is registered to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5 in place of the unregistered subcontractor.

(e) The department shall maintain on its internet website a list of contractors who are currently
 registered to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5.

(f) A contract entered into with any contractor or subcontractor in violation of subdivision (a) shall be subject to cancellation, provided that a contract for public work shall not be unlawful, void, or voidable solely due to the failure of the awarding body, contractor, or any subcontractor to comply with the requirements of Section 1725.5 or this section.

(g) If the Labor Commissioner or their designee determines that a contractor or subcontractor engaged in the performance of any public work contract without having been registered in accordance with this section, the contractor or subcontractor shall forfeit, as a civil penalty to the state, one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of work performed in violation of
 the registration requirement, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) in addition to any penalty registration fee assessed pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1725.5.

(h) (1) In addition to, or in lieu of, any other penalty or sanction authorized pursuant to this chapter, a higher tiered public works contractor or subcontractor who is found to have entered into a subcontract with an unregistered lower tier subcontractor to perform any public work in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.5 or this section shall be subject to forfeiture, as a civil penalty to the state, of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the unregistered lower tier subcontractor performs work in violation of the registration requirement, not to exceed an
 aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall use the same standards specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1775 when determining the severity of the violation and what penalty to assess, and may waive the penalty for a first time violation that was unintentional and did not hinder the Labor Commissioner’s ability to monitor and enforce compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3) A higher tiered public works contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for penalties assessed pursuant to paragraph (1) if the lower tier subcontractor’s performance is in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.5 due to the revocation of a previously approved registration.

(4) A subcontractor shall not be liable for any penalties assessed against a higher tiered public works contractor or subcontractor pursuant to paragraph (1). A higher tiered public works contractor or subcontractor may not require a lower tiered subcontractor to indemnify or otherwise be liable for any penalties pursuant to paragraph (1).

(i) The Labor Commissioner or their designee shall issue a civil wage and penalty assessment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1741, upon determination of penalties pursuant to subdivision (g) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (h). Review of a civil wage and penalty assessment issued under this subdivision may be requested in accordance with the provisions of Section 1742. The regulations of the Director of Industrial Relations, which govern
 proceedings for review of civil wage and penalty assessments and the withholding of contract payments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), shall apply.

(j) (1) Where a contractor or subcontractor engages in the performance of any public work contract without having been registered in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.5 or this section, the Labor Commissioner shall issue and serve a stop order prohibiting the use of the unregistered contractor or the unregistered subcontractor on all public works until the unregistered contractor or unregistered subcontractor is registered. The stop order shall not apply to work by registered contractors or subcontractors on the public work.

(2) A stop order
 may be personally served upon the contractor or subcontractor by either of the following methods:

(A) Manual delivery of the order to the contractor or subcontractor personally.

(B) Leaving signed copies of the order with the person who is apparently in charge at the site of the public work and by thereafter mailing copies of the order by first-class mail, postage prepaid to the contractor or subcontractor at one of the following:

(i) The address of the contractor or subcontractor on file with either the Secretary of State or the Contractors State License Board.

(ii) If the contractor or subcontractor has no address on file with the Secretary of State or the
 Contractors State License Board, the address of the site of the public work.

(3) The stop order shall be effective immediately upon service and shall be subject to appeal by the party contracting with the unregistered contractor or subcontractor, by the unregistered contractor or subcontractor, or both. The appeal, hearing, and any further review of the hearing decision shall be governed by the procedures, time limits, and other requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 238.1.

(4) Any employee of an unregistered contractor or subcontractor who is affected by a work stoppage ordered by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid at their regular hourly prevailing wage rate by that employer for any hours the employee would have worked but for the work
 stoppage, not to exceed 10 days.

(k) Failure of a contractor or subcontractor, owner, director, officer, or managing agent of the contractor or subcontractor to observe a stop order issued and served upon them pursuant to subdivision (j) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in county jail not exceeding 60 days or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

(l) This section shall apply to any bid proposal submitted on or after March 1, 2015, and any contract for public work entered into on or after April 1, 2015. This section shall also apply to the performance of any public work, as defined in this chapter, on or after January 1, 2018, regardless of when the contract for public work was entered.

(m) Penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(n) This section shall not apply to work performed on a public works project of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less when the project is for construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work or to work performed on a public works project of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less when the project is for maintenance work.

(o) Awarding authorities shall annually submit to the Department of
 Industrial Relations’ electronic project registration database a list of contractors that are ineligible to bid on or be awarded a public works contract, or to perform work as a subcontractor on a public works project, pursuant to local debarment or suspension processes. The electronic database list shall contain the name of the contractor, the Contractors State License Board license number of the contractor, the specific jurisdiction where the debarment or suspension applies, and the effective period of debarment or suspension of the contractor. The electronic database list shall be updated at least annually. The department shall make the lists provided by awarding authorities available to the public through its project registration database, but shall have no responsibility for verifying or ensuring the accuracy of the information provided by awarding authorities, and shall have no liability in any respect with regard to such lists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 465, Sec. 1.   (AB 1121)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.15.

(a) A contractor or subcontractor shall not be qualified to be awarded contracts for, or engage in the performance of, any work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any work on projects or developments where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6, unless currently registered and qualified to
 perform work pursuant to Section 1725.6.

(b) Notice of the requirement described in subdivision (a) shall be included in all bid invitations and contracts for any work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or for any work on projects or developments where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6, and a bid shall not be accepted nor any contract or subcontract entered into without proof of the contractor or
 subcontractor’s current registration to perform work pursuant to Section 1725.6.

(c) The department shall maintain on its internet website a list of contractors who are currently registered to perform work pursuant to Section 1725.6.

(d) A contract entered into with any contractor or subcontractor in violation of subdivision (a) shall be subject to cancellation, provided that a contract for work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or a contract for work on projects or developments where a
 statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 shall not be unlawful, void, or voidable solely due to the failure of the developer, development proponent, contractor, or any subcontractor to comply with the requirements of Section 1725.6 or this section.

(e) If the Labor Commissioner or their designee determines that a contractor or subcontractor engaged in the performance of any a contract for work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any work on projects or developments where a statute or regulation
 requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 without having been registered in accordance with
 Section 1725.6, the contractor or subcontractor shall forfeit, as a civil penalty to the state, one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of work performed in violation of the registration requirement, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) in addition to any penalty registration fee assessed pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1725.6.

(f) (1) In addition to, or in lieu of, any other penalty or sanction authorized pursuant to this chapter, a higher tiered contractor or subcontractor who is found to have entered into a subcontract with an unregistered lower tier subcontractor to perform any work in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.6 or this section shall be subject to forfeiture, as a civil penalty to the state, of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the unregistered lower tier
 subcontractor performs work in violation of the registration requirement, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall use the same standards specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1775 when determining the severity of the violation and what penalty to assess, and may waive the penalty for a first time violation that was unintentional and did not hinder the Labor Commissioner’s ability to monitor and enforce compliance with the requirements of this chapter and of the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131,
 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code and the statutes that require registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 and include prevailing wage or skilled and trained workforce requirements.

(3) A higher tiered contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for penalties assessed pursuant to paragraph (1) if the lower tier subcontractor’s performance is in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.6 due to the revocation of a previously approved registration.

(4) A subcontractor shall not be liable for any penalties assessed against a higher tiered contractor or subcontractor pursuant to paragraph (1). A higher tiered contractor or subcontractor
 may not require a lower tiered subcontractor to indemnify or otherwise be liable for any penalties pursuant to paragraph (1).

(g) The Labor Commissioner or their designee shall issue a civil wage and penalty assessment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1741, upon determination of penalties pursuant to subdivision (e) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). Review of a civil wage and penalty assessment issued under this subdivision may be requested in accordance with the provisions of Section 1742. The regulations of the Director of Industrial Relations, which govern proceedings for review of civil wage and penalty assessments and the withholding of contract payments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), shall apply.

(h) (1) Where a contractor or subcontractor engages in the performance of any
 contract for work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131,
 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any contract for work on projects or developments where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to Section 1725.6 without having been registered in violation of the requirements of Section 1725.6 or this section, the Labor Commissioner shall issue and serve a stop order prohibiting the use of the unregistered contractor or the unregistered subcontractor on the project or development until the unregistered contractor or unregistered subcontractor is registered. The stop order shall not apply to work by registered contractors or subcontractors on the project or development.

(2) A stop order may be personally served upon the contractor or subcontractor by either of the following methods:

(A) Manual delivery of the order to the contractor or subcontractor personally.

(B) Leaving signed copies of the order with the person who is apparently in charge at the site of the project or development and by thereafter mailing copies of the order by first class mail, postage prepaid to the contractor or subcontractor at one of the following:

(i) The address of the contractor or subcontractor on file with either the Secretary of State or the Contractors State License Board.

(ii) If the contractor or subcontractor has no address on file with the Secretary of State or the Contractors State License Board, the address of the site of the project or development.

(3) The stop order shall be effective immediately upon service and shall be
 subject to appeal by the party contracting with the unregistered contractor or subcontractor, by the unregistered contractor or subcontractor, or both. The appeal, hearing, and any further review of the hearing decision shall be governed by the procedures, time limits, and other requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 238.1.

(4) Any employee of an unregistered contractor or subcontractor who is affected by a work stoppage ordered by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid at their regular hourly prevailing wage rate by that employer for any hours the employee would have worked but for the work stoppage, not to exceed 10 days.

(i) Failure of a contractor or subcontractor, owner, director, officer, or managing agent of the contractor or subcontractor to observe a stop order issued and served upon them pursuant to this subdivision is guilty of a
 misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in county jail not exceeding 60 days, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

(j) Penalties received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 52, Sec. 25.   (AB 171)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.2.

(a) A joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against an employer that fails to pay the prevailing wage to its employees, as required by this article, or that fails to provide payroll records as required by Section 1776. This action shall be commenced not later than 18 months after the filing of a valid notice of completion in the office of the county recorder in each county in which the public work or some part thereof was performed, or not later than 18 months after acceptance of the public work, whichever
 occurs last.

(b) (1) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court shall award restitution to an employee for unpaid wages, plus interest, under Section 3289 of the Civil Code from the date that the wages became due and payable, and liquidated damages equal to the amount of unpaid wages owed, and may impose civil penalties, only against an employer that failed to pay the prevailing wage to its employees, in accordance with Section 1775, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate form of equitable relief. The court shall follow the same standards and have the same discretion in setting the amount of penalties as are provided by subdivision (a) of Section 1775. The court shall award a prevailing joint labor-management committee its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in maintaining the action, including
 expert witness fees.

(2) An action pursuant to this section shall not be based on the employer’s misclassification of the craft of a worker in its certified payroll records.

(3) Liquidated damages shall be awarded only if the complaint alleges with specificity the wages due and unpaid to the individual workers, including how that amount was calculated, and the defendant fails to pay the wages, deposit that amount with the court to be held in escrow, or provide proof to the court of an adequate surety bond to cover the wages, within 60 days of service of the complaint. Liquidated damages shall be awarded only on the wages found to be due and unpaid. Additionally, if the defendant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the court that the defendant had substantial grounds for
 contesting that a portion of the allegedly unpaid wages were owed, the court may exercise its discretion to waive the payment of the liquidated damages with respect to that portion of the unpaid wages.

(4) This subdivision does not limit any other available remedies for a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.   (AB 3231)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.3.

(a) The State Public Works Enforcement Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury to be available upon appropriation of the Legislature. All registration fees collected pursuant to Sections 1725.5 and 1725.6 and any other moneys as are designated by statute or order shall be deposited in the fund for the purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(b) Moneys in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund shall be used only for the following
 purposes:

(1) The reasonable costs of administering the registration of contractors and subcontractors to perform public work pursuant to Section 1725.5 and the reasonable costs of administering the registration of contractors and subcontractors to perform work on projects or developments subject to prevailing wage or skilled and trained workforce requirements pursuant to Section 1725.6.

(2) The costs and obligations associated with the administration and enforcement of the requirements of this chapter by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(3) The monitoring and enforcement of any requirement of this code by the
 Labor Commissioner on a public works project or in connection with the performance of public work as defined pursuant to this
 chapter, or in connection with the performance of work on projects or developments subject to prevailing wage or skilled and trained workforce requirements.

(c) The annual contractor registration renewal fee specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1725.5 and subdivision (a) of Section 1725.6, and any adjusted application or renewal fee, shall be set in amounts that are sufficient to support